Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.050

Petition for marketing order—Deposit to defray department's expenses—Circumstances requiring reimbursement.

(1) Petitions for issuance, amendment or termination of a marketing order shall be signed by not less than five percent or one hundred of the producers alleged to be affected, whichever is less, and shall be filed with the director. A petition for amendment or termination of a marketing order may be submitted to the director by majority vote of a commission.

(2) A commission shall reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department when a commodity commission petitions the director to amend or terminate a marketing order and for other services provided by the department under this chapter. The department shall provide to a commodity commission an estimate of expenses that may be incurred to amend or terminate a marketing order prior to any services taking place.

(3) Petitioners who are not a majority of a commission, and who file a petition with the director to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order, shall deposit funds with the director to pay for expenses incurred by the department, under rules adopted by the director.

(4) A commission shall reimburse petitioners the amount paid to the department under the following circumstances:

(a) If the petition is to issue a marketing order, the commission shall reimburse the petitioners the amount expended by the department when funds become available after establishment of the commission; or

(b) If the petition is to amend or terminate a marketing order, the commission shall reimburse the petitioners within thirty days of the referendum if the proposal is assented to by the affected producers.

(5) If for any reason a proceeding is discontinued, the commission or petitioners, whichever is applicable, shall reimburse the department only for expenses incurred by the department up until the time the proceeding is discontinued.

[ 2002 c 313 s 42; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.050. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.